Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4877.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1310g. Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, the legislature shall appropriate funds each fiscal year to public schools for the purpose of assisting at-risk pupils as described in section 31a of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1631a. The amount appropriated to each public school under this section must be equal to 35% of the foundation allowance received by that public school under section 20 of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1620, in the fiscal year in which funds are appropriated under this section.